Georgia, session 2025_26, SB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to certification of motor carriers, is amended by repealing in its entirety Code
Section 40-1-118, relating to establishment of rates, fares, and charges for transportation of
household goods, and designating said Code section as reserved.
SECTION 2.
Said part is further amended by revising Code Section 40-1-119, relating to charges by motor
carriers and unjust discrimination by carriers prohibited, as follows:
S. B. 283
- 1 -

LC 55 0535
"40-1-119.
No motor carrier of household goods or passengers shall charge, demand, collect, or
receive a greater or lesser or different compensation for the transportation of household
goods or passengers or for any service rendered in connection therewith than the rates,
fares, and charges prescribed or approved by order of the department; nor shall any such
motor carrier unjustly discriminate against any person in its rates, fares, or charges for
service. The commissioner may prescribe, by general order, to what persons motor carriers
of passengers may issue passes or free transportation; may prescribe reduced rates for
special occasions; and may fix and prescribe rates and schedules."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 283
- 2 -